Alaska, session 34, HB186.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 36.05 is amended by adding a new section to article 1 to read: 05 Sec. 36.05.125. Use of apprentice labor in construction. (a) To the extent 06 practicable, each construction contract that the Department of Transportation and 07 Public Facilities or the Department of Administration advertises for bids that has a 08 contract award amount of $2,500,000 or more must require that not less than 15 09 percent of the labor hours on a project be performed by apprentices in the following 10 occupations: 11 (1) boilermakers; 12 (2) bricklayers; 13 (3) carpenters; 14 (4) cement masons; 01 (5) culinary workers; 02 (6) electricians; 03 (7) elevator constructors and mechanics; 04 (8) equipment operators; 05 (9) insulation workers; 06 (10) ironworkers; 07 (11) laborers; 08 (12) mechanics; 09 (13) millwrights; 10 (14) painters; 11 (15) pile driving occupations; 12 (16) plumbers and pipefitters; 13 (17) roofers; 14 (18) sheet metal workers; 15 (19) sprinkler fitters; 16 (20) surveyors; 17 (21) truck drivers; 18 (22) tugboat workers; and 19 (23) welders. 20 (b) The commissioner of transportation and public facilities or the 21 commissioner of administration shall provide to the commissioner of labor and 22 workforce development the following information for each construction project 23 subject to (a) of this section: 24 (1) the name of the project; 25 (2) the dollar value of the project; 26 (3) the name of the prime contractor and contact information for the 27 prime contractor; 28 (4) the name of each subcontractor and contact information as 29 provided to the department by the prime contractor; 30 (5) the percentage of labor hours that will be performed by 31 apprentices; and 01 (6) the occupation title of each apprentice used. 02 (c) The commissioner of labor and workforce development shall collect data 03 on the total apprentice hours worked on each construction project that is provided to 04 the commissioner under (b) of this section. 05 (d) This section does not apply to a construction project if applying the 06 requirements of this section to the project would cause the state to lose federal 07 funding. 08 (e) In this section, 09 (1) "apprentice" means an apprentice enrolled in a registered 10 apprenticeship program under 29 U.S.C. 50; 11 (2) "construction" means the process of building, altering, repairing, 12 maintaining, improving, or demolishing a public highway, structure, building, or other 13 public improvement for any kind of real property other than privately owned real 14 property leased for the use of agencies; "construction" does not include professional 15 and other services related to the planning and design required for a construction 16 project, the routine operation of a public improvement to real property, or the 17 construction of public housing; 18 (3) "labor hours" means the total hours of work performed by 19 construction workers on a project in job classes subject to minimum wage rates under 20 AS 36.05.070. 21 * Sec. 2. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 22 read: 23 REPORT TO THE LEGISLATURE. The commissioner of labor and workforce 24 development shall, with the assistance of the commissioner of administration and the 25 commissioner of transportation and public facilities, submit a report to the legislature 26 identifying the percentage of apprentice labor hours in the occupations listed in AS 36.05.125 27 that were used in each construction contract subject to AS 36.05.125 for the fiscal years 28 ending June 30, 2026, June 30, 2027, June 30, 2028, June 30, 2029, and June 30, 2030. The 29 commissioner of labor and workforce development shall deliver the report to the senate 30 secretary and chief clerk of the house of representatives on or before September 1, 2030, and 31 shall notify the legislature that the report is available. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.